Massachusetts, session 194th, S2070.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended by inserting the following:-
Twenty-second I. Notwithstanding any provision of general or special law to the
contrary, an abatement granted pursuant to clause Twenty-second, Twenty-second A, Twenty-
second B, Twenty-second C, Twenty-second D, Twenty-second E, Twenty-second F, Twenty-
second G, Twenty-second H, shall be increased annually by a city or town in an amount not to
exceed the increase in the cost of living as determined by the Consumer Price Index for such
year.
of 1